Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 56
COOPERATIVES

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 3 of chapter 30, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1996, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1996, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Law reviews:

For article, "The New

C

olorado

C

ooperative Act: A Setting for a Business Structure", see 25 Colo. Law. 3 (Dec. 1996); for article, "Colorado Choice of Entity 1998", see 27 Colo. Law. 5 (June 1998); for article, "Colorado Choice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article, "Worker Cooperatives: Their Time Has Arrived", see 40 Colo. Law. 33 (Sept. 2011); for article, "The Long and Winding Road to Public Benefit Corporations in Colorado", see 43 Colo. Law. 39 (Jan. 2014).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 INCORPORATION

PART 3 MEMBERS AND OWNERSHIP

PART 4 OFFICERS AND ELECTIONS

PART 5 POWERS AND PURPOSES: APPLICATION OF OTHER LAWS

PART 6 PROPERTY ENCUMBRANCES, BUSINESS COMBINATIONS,
AND PROPERTY SALES

PART 7 DISSOLUTION

SUBPART 1 VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTION

SUBPART 2 ADMINISTRATIVE DISSOLUTION

SUBPART 3 JUDICIAL DISSOLUTION

SUBPART 4 MISCELLANEOUS

PART 8 FOREIGN COOPERATIVES

PART 9 TRANSITION PROVISIONS